Washington statutes.
RCW 27.04.105

Grant pilot program—Student aid—Report.

(1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the state library shall administer a grant pilot program with the purpose of increasing free application for federal student aid and Washington application for state financial aid completion rates.

(2) The state library shall administer grants to local public libraries located within educational service districts that are in the bottom two for free application for federal student aid completion rates when combining their respective school districts' free application for federal student aid completion rates over the past three completed academic years prior to June 9, 2022. The state library shall, as a condition of the grant pilot program, require local public libraries to partner with community-based organizations including, where appropriate, organizations with proven track records of working with historically underrepresented populations, to increase free application for federal student aid and Washington application for state financial aid completion. The organization or organizations selected shall:

(a) Be embedded in their respective community and have a strong foundation of trust among members of the community; and

(b) Be committed to working directly with individual members of their community to assist with one-on-one free application for federal student aid and Washington application for state financial aid completion and to provide information on how to access private scholarships.

(3) The state library shall report annually to the appropriate committees of the legislature in accordance with RCW 43.01.036 beginning December 1, 2023, on the progress of the library outreach pilot project to boost free application for federal student aid and Washington application for state financial aid completion rates. The report must include the specific number of students that were assisted through the grant pilot program.

[ 2022 c 214 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 214: See note following RCW 28B.77.300.